District of Columbia statutes.
1-1328

Adjusting lines of buildings; certificate as evidence.

It shall be the duty of the Surveyor or registered land surveyor to attend and examine the foundation or walls of any house to be erected for the purpose of adjusting the line of the front of such building to the line of the street and correctly placing the party wall on the line of division between that and the adjoining lot; and his certificate of the fact shall be admitted as evidence and binding on the parties interested.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1426, ch. 854, § 1589
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 545, ch. 1329
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 5005(f), 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-928.
1973 Ed., § 1-628.